Washington statutes.
RCW 35.72.030

Reimbursement by other property owners—Reimbursement share.

The reimbursement shall be a pro rata share of construction and reimbursement of contract administration costs of the street project. A city, town, or county shall determine the reimbursement share by using a method of cost apportionment which is based on the benefit to the property owner from such project.

[ 1983 c 126 s 3.]